Louisiana, session 2026, HB1132.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:350.21(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§350.21. University laboratory schools operated by certain public universities;
funding formula
A.(1)(a) Any elementary or secondary school operated by Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College, Southern University and
Agricultural and Mechanical College, the University of Louisiana at Lafayette, or the
University of Louisiana at Monroe shall be considered a public elementary or
secondary school and, as such, shall be annually appropriated funds as determined
by applying the formula as specified in Subsection B of this Section.
(b) In addition to the schools provided for in Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph, any elementary or secondary school established on or after August 1,
2026, and operated by an institution under the supervision and management of the
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1132 ENROLLED
Board of Supervisors for the University of Louisiana System shall be considered a
public elementary or secondary school and, as such, shall be annually appropriated
funds as determined by applying the formula as specified in Subsection B of this
Section.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.